Hawaii statutes.
[§346-372] Provider agency
and donor cooperation are not in restraint of trade. No provider agency or
any other agency, or donor or donors, or method or act thereof that complies
with this part shall be deemed a conspiracy or combination in restraint of
trade or an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition or fix prices
arbitrarily, or the creation of a combination or pool, or to accomplish any
improper or illegal purpose. Any cooperation or agreement established pursuant
to rule shall not be considered as illegal, in restraint of trade, or as part
of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish an illegal purpose or act. [L
2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next